Utah statutes.
72-10-213.   Severability clause.

If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, this invalidity does not affect provisions or applications of the part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are declared to be severable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

